West Virginia, session 2026, SB943.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 5. record keeping and database. §49-5-106. Data Collection [Repealed.] NOTE: The purpose of this bill is to repeal a section dealing with data collection for the Juvenile Reform Oversight Committee, which terms have expired due to a sunset provision. Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home